Utah statutes.
40-8-4.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "Adjudicative proceeding" means:
(a)  a division or board action or proceeding determining the legal rights,
duties, privileges, immunities, or other legal interests of one or more
identifiable persons, including actions to grant, deny, revoke, suspend,
modify, annul, withdraw, or amend an authority, right, permit, or license; or
(b)  judicial review of a division or board action or proceeding specified in
Subsection (1)(a).
(2)  "Applicant" means a person who has filed a notice of intent to commence
mining operations, or who has applied to the board for a review of a notice or
order.
(3) (a)  "Approved notice of intention" means a formally filed notice of
intention to commence mining operations, including revisions to it, which has
been approved under Section 40-8-13.
(b)  An approved notice of intention is not required for small mining
operations.
(4)  "Board" means the Board of Oil, Gas, and Mining.
(5)  "Conference" means an informal adjudicative proceeding conducted by the
division or board.
(6) (a)  "Deposit" or "mineral deposit" means an accumulation of mineral
matter in the form of consolidated rock, unconsolidated material, solutions,
or occurring on the surface, beneath the surface, or in the waters of the land
from which any product useful to man may be produced, extracted, or obtained
or which is extracted by underground mining methods for underground storage.
(b)  "Deposit" or "mineral deposit" excludes sand, gravel, rock aggregate,
water, geothermal steam, and oil and gas as defined in Title 40, Chapter 6,
Board and Division of Oil, Gas, and Mining, but includes oil shale and
bituminous sands extracted by mining operations.
(7)  "Development" means the work performed in relation to a deposit following
its discovery but prior to and in contemplation of production mining
operations, aimed at, but not limited to, preparing the site for mining
operations, defining further the ore deposit by drilling or other means,
conducting pilot plant operations, constructing roads or ancillary facilities,
and other related activities.
(8)  "Division" means the Division of Oil, Gas, and Mining.
(9)  "Emergency order" means an order issued by the board in accordance with
the provisions of Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act.
(10) (a)  "Exploration" means surface-disturbing activities conducted for the
purpose of discovering a deposit or mineral deposit, delineating the
boundaries of a deposit or mineral deposit, and identifying regions or
specific areas in which deposits or mineral deposits are most likely to exist.
(b)  "Exploration" includes, but is not limited to: sinking shafts; tunneling;
drilling holes and digging pits or cuts; building of roads, and other access
ways; and constructing and operating other facilities related to these
activities.
(11)  "Hearing" means a formal adjudicative proceeding conducted by the board
under its procedural rules.
(12) (a)  "Imminent danger to the health and safety of the public" means the
existence of a condition or practice, or a violation of a permit requirement
or other requirement of this chapter in a mining operation, which condition,
practice, or violation could reasonably be expected to cause substantial
physical harm to persons outside the permit area before the condition,
practice, or violation can be abated.
(b)  A reasonable expectation of death or serious injury before abatement
exists if a rational person, subjected to the same conditions or practices
giving rise to the peril, would not expose himself or herself to the danger
during the time necessary for abatement.
(13) (a)  "Land affected" means the surface and subsurface of an area within
the state where mining operations are being or will be conducted, including,
but not limited to:
(i)  on-site private ways, roads, and railroads;
(ii)  land excavations;
(iii)  exploration sites;
(iv)  drill sites or workings;
(v)  refuse banks or spoil piles;
(vi)  evaporation or settling ponds;
(vii)  stockpiles;
(viii)  leaching dumps;
(ix)  placer areas;
(x)  tailings ponds or dumps; and
(xi)  work, parking, storage, or waste discharge areas, structures, and
facilities.
(b)  All lands shall be excluded from the provisions of Subsection (13)(a)
that would:
(i)  be includable as land affected, but which have been reclaimed in
accordance with an approved plan, as may be approved by the board; and
(ii)  lands in which mining operations have ceased prior to July 1, 1977.
(14) (a)  "Mining operation" means activities conducted on the surface of the
land for the exploration for, development of, or extraction of a mineral
deposit, including, but not limited to, surface mining and the surface effects
of underground and in situ mining, on-site transportation, concentrating,
milling, evaporation, and other primary processing.
(b)  "Mining operation" does not include:
(i)  the extraction of sand, gravel, and rock aggregate;
(ii)  the extraction of oil and gas as defined in Title 40, Chapter 6, Board
and Division of Oil, Gas, and Mining;
(iii)  the extraction of geothermal steam;
(iv)  smelting or refining operations;
(v)  off-site operations and transportation;
(vi)  reconnaissance activities; or
(vii)  activities which will not cause significant surface resource
disturbance or involve the use of mechanized earth-moving equipment, such as
bulldozers or backhoes.
(15)  "Notice" means:
(a)  notice of intention, as defined in this chapter; or
(b)  written information given to an operator by the division describing
compliance conditions at a mining operation.
(16)  "Notice of intention" means a notice to commence mining operations,
including revisions to the notice.
(17)  "Off-site" means the land areas that are outside of or beyond the on-
site land.
(18) (a)  "On-site" means the surface lands on or under which surface or
underground mining operations are conducted.
(b)  A series of related properties under the control of a single operator,
but separated by small parcels of land controlled by others, will be
considered to be a single site unless an exception is made by the division.
(19)  "Operator" means a natural person, corporation, association,
partnership, receiver, trustee, executor, administrator, guardian, fiduciary,
agent, or other organization or representative, either public or private,
owning, controlling, or managing a mining operation or proposed mining
operation.
(20)  "Order" means written information provided by the division or board to
an operator or other parties, describing the compliance status of a permit or
mining operation.
(21)  "Owner" means a natural person, corporation, association, partnership,
receiver, trustee, executor, administrator, guardian, fiduciary, agent, or
other organization or representative, either public or private, owning,
controlling, or managing a mineral deposit or the surface of lands employed in
mining operations.
(22)  "Permit area" means the area of land indicated on the approved map
submitted by the operator with the application or notice to conduct mining
operations.
(23)  "Permit" means a permit or notice to conduct mining operations issued by
the division.
(24)  "Permittee" means a person holding, or who is required by Utah law to
hold, a valid permit or notice to conduct mining operations.
(25)  "Person" means an individual, partnership, association, society, joint
stock company, firm, company, corporation, or other governmental or business
organization.
(26)  "Reclamation" means actions performed during or after mining operations
to shape, stabilize, revegetate, or treat the land affected in order to
achieve a safe, stable, ecological condition and use which will be consistent
with local environmental conditions.
(27)  "Small mining operations" means mining operations which disturb or will
disturb five or less surface acres at any given time.
(28)  "Unwarranted failure to comply" means the failure of a permittee to
prevent the occurrence of a violation of the permit or a requirement of this
chapter due to indifference, lack of diligence, or lack of reasonable care, or
the failure to abate a violation of the permit or this chapter due to
indifference, lack of diligence, or lack of reasonable care.
